Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska50-1402
Legislature's Planning Committee;
established; members; staff.

The Legislature's Planning Committee is hereby established
as a special legislative committee to exercise the authority and perform the
duties provided for in this section. The committee shall be comprised of the
Speaker of the Legislature, the chairperson of the Executive Board of the
Legislative Council, the chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the
Legislature, and six other members of the Legislature to be chosen by the
Executive Board of the Legislative Council. The executive board shall ensure
that the Legislature's Planning Committee includes adequate geographic representation.
The chairperson and vice-chairperson of the committee shall be elected by
majority vote of the committee. The committee shall be subject to all rules
prescribed by the Legislature. The initial members of the committee shall
be appointed as soon as possible after May 14, 2009, and thereafter the committee
shall be appointed at the beginning of each regular legislative session and
shall meet as needed. The committee shall have staff support from the various
legislative divisions and staff.

Laws 2009, LB653, § 2.